Vermont, session 2025-2026, H629.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 12 V.S.A. § 506 is amended to read:
§ 506. JUDGMENTS
(a) Actions Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, actions on
judgments and actions for the renewal or revival of judgments shall be brought
in the Civil Division of the Superior Court by filing a new and independent
action on the judgment within eight years after the rendition of the judgment,
and not after.
VT LEG #386219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.629
2026 Page 2 of 3
(b) The Family Division of the Superior Court shall have exclusive
jurisdiction over actions on judgments issued by Family Division.
(1) Renewal of a Family Division judgment for money or property shall
be initiated specifically by a motion to renew in the county that issued the
underlying judgment within eight years after the rendition of the judgment or
when the last payment or action required is due, whichever occurs last. A
motion to renew a Family Division judgment for money or property shall be
served upon all respondent parties in the manner prescribed for the filing of a
new action for divorce or parentage. A judgment issued by the Family
Division pursuant to a motion to renew such a judgment shall restart the eight-
year limitation on actions on judgments.
(2) The filing of a motion to renew shall pause tolling of the statute of
limitations until the court rules upon the motion.
(3) Any of the following shall restart the statutory limitation in
subdivision (1) of this subsection:
(A) a written, signed acknowledgement of the debt, action, or
obligation ordered in the judgment;
(B) any payment made by an obligor on a Family Division judgment,
including by wage withholding;
(C) any affirmation action taken by an obligor toward compliance
with the provisions of a Family Division judgment; or
VT LEG #386219 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.629
2026 Page 3 of 3
(D) any payment made by a third party on behalf of the obligor
specifically toward the Family Division judgment.
(4) All property or money judgments issued by the Family Division
shall bear the following statement: “RENEWAL OF A FAMILY DIVISION
JUDGMENT FOR MONEY OR PROPERTY SHALL BE INITIATED BY
MOTION TO RENEW WITHIN EIGHT YEARS AFTER RENDITION OF
THE JUDGMENT OR IT SHALL BE TIME BARRED.”
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386219 v.1